Hawaii statutes.
[§200-22] Purpose. The purpose of this
part is to authorize the chairperson to adopt rules for the regulation of
vessels and their use in the waters of the State, which, together with the
provisions of this part, shall conform with and supplement federal laws and
requirements to fully implement the declared policy of section 200-21. [L 1991,
c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next